Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.035

Eligibility to serve as receiver.

Except as provided in this chapter or otherwise by statute, any person, whether or not a resident of this state, may serve as a receiver, with the exception that a person may not be appointed as a receiver, and shall be replaced as receiver if already appointed, if it should appear to the court that the person:

(1) Has been convicted of a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude or is controlled by a person who has been convicted of a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude;

(2) Is a party to the action, or is a parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, sibling, partner, director, officer, agent, attorney, employee, secured or unsecured creditor or lienor of, or holder of any equity interest in, or controls or is controlled by, the person whose property is to be held by the receiver, or who is the agent or attorney of any disqualified person;

(3) Has an interest materially adverse to the interest of persons to be affected by the receivership generally; or

(4) Is the sheriff of any county.

[ 2004 c 165 s 5.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.